Maryland, session 2026, HB0456.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
23–102.
This title applies only in Howard County.
23–1003.1.
(A) THERE IS A GIFT BASKET PERMIT.
– 1 –

Ch. 817 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(B) (1) THE BOARD MAY ISSUE THE PERMIT TO A PERSON:
(I) WHOSE PRIMARY BUSINESS IS THE SALE AND DELIVERY OF
FLOWERS;
(II) WHOSE BUSINESS INCLUDES THE SALE AND DELIVERY OF
GIFT BASKETS OF FLOWERS, FOOD, OR OTHER ITEMS; AND
(III) WHO DOES NOT HOLD ANY OTHER ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES
LICENSE OR PERMIT UNDER THIS ARTICLE.
(2) THE BOARD MAY NOT ISSUE THE PERMIT FOR USE IN
CONJUNCTION WITH OR ON THE PREMISES OF A CHAIN STORE, SUPERMARKET, OR
DISCOUNT HOUSE.
(C) A HOLDER OF THE PERMIT:
(1) MAY SELL AND DELIVER, TO CONSUMERS OF A LEGAL DRINKING
AGE LOCATED IN THE COUNTY, GIFT BASKETS CONTAINING:
(I) NOT MORE THAN 72 OUNCES OF BEER;
(II) NOT MORE THAN 2.25 LITERS OF WINE; OR
(III) NOT MORE THAN 2.25 LITERS OF LIQUOR; AND
(2) SHALL MAINTAIN RECORDS AND SUBMIT REPORTS AS REQUIRED
BY THE BOARD.
(D) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE PERMIT
HOLDER OR AN EMPLOYEE OF THE PERMIT HOLDER SHALL:
(I) DELIVER THE GIFT BASKET CONTAINING ALCOHOLIC
BEVERAGES; AND
(II) REQUIRE THE PERSON RECEIVING A DELIVERY OF A GIFT
BASKET CONTAINING ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES TO DISPLAY PROOF THAT THE
PERSON IS AT LEAST 21 YEARS OLD.
(2) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO DELIVERS A GIFT BASKET CONTAINING
ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES SHALL BE AT LEAST 21 YEARS OLD.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 817
(E) THE HOLDER’S ANNUAL SALES FROM ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES MAY NOT
EXCEED 10% OF THE HOLDER’S ANNUAL GROSS SALES.
(F) THE ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES CONTAINED IN A GIFT BASKET SHALL BE
PURCHASED FROM A RETAIL LICENSE HOLDER.
(G) THE BOARD SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS SECTION.
(H) THE FEE FOR A GIFT BASKET PERMIT IS $100.
23–1602.
(a) (1) Subject to subsection (b) of this section, the Board may not issue:
(i) a Class B license for a restaurant that is within 400 feet of the
nearest point of a public school building; or
(ii) any other license for an establishment that is within 500 feet of
the nearest point of a public school building.
(2) A decision of the County Board of Education to locate a public school
building within 500 feet of the premises of a license holder may not be the basis to revoke
or deny the renewal or transfer of the license.
(b) For a license issued on or before June 30, 1971, the Board may renew the
license or approve the transfer of the license to a new license holder for the same
establishment and type of license.
(C) THE PROHIBITION AGAINST ISSUING A LICENSE IN SUBSECTION (A) OF
THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO THE ISSUANCE OF A GIFT BASKET PERMIT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 3 –